Utah statutes.
32A-12-217 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful permitting of consumption by minors.

(1)  A person may not permit any minor to consume any alcoholic beverage in any chartered bus or limousine of which the person is the owner or operator.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is an infraction.

